Wyoming statutes. Title 35 Public Health and Safety
Article 2. Fireworks

Am. Jur. 2d, ALR and C.J.S. references. —

Validity, construction, and application of state or local laws regulating the sale, possession, use, or transport of fireworks, 48 ALR5th 659.

§ 35-10-201.
Definitions.

“Fireworks” means any article, device or substance prepared for the primary purpose of producing a visual or auditory sensation by combustion, explosion, deflagration or detonation, including any item which may be sold or offered for sale under 15 U.S.C. § 1261, 21 U.S.C. § 371 and 16 C.F.R., Commercial Practices, part 1507.

“Governing body” means the board of county commissioners as to the area within a county but outside the corporate limits of any city or town; or means the city council or other governing body of a city or town as to the area within the corporate limits of such city or town.

“Person” shall include an individual, partnership, co-partnership, firm, company, association or corporation.

“Commercial motor vehicle” means any self-propelled or towed vehicle used on public highways in interstate commerce to transport passengers or property and the vehicle meets one (1) of the following:

The vehicle has a gross vehicle weight rating or gross combination weight rating of ten thousand one (10,001) pounds;

The vehicle is designed to transport more than fifteen (15) passengers including the driver; or

The vehicle is used in the transportation of hazardous materials in a quantity requiring placarding under regulations issued by the secretary of transportation under the federal Hazardous Materials Transportation Act, 49 U.S.C. § 5101 et seq.

History.

Laws 1953, ch. 30, § 1; W.S. 1957, § 35-469; Laws 1983, ch. 119, § 1; 1995, ch. 166, § 2; 2006, ch. 114, § 1.

The 2006 amendment,

substituted “49 U.S.C. § 5101 et seq.” for “49 U.S.C. §§ 1801-1813” in (d)(iii).

Laws 2006, ch. 114, § 5, makes the act effective immediately upon completion of all acts necessary for a bill to become law as provided by art. 4, § 8, Wyo. Const. Approved March 24, 2006.

Editor's notes. —

The Hazardous Materials Transportation Act, referred to in paragraph (d)(iii), was repealed by P.L. 103-272. For present similar provisions, see 49 U.S.C. § 5101 et seq.

Conflicting legislation. —

Laws 2006, ch. 114, § 3 provides: “[A]ny other act adopted by the Wyoming legislature during the same session in which this act is adopted shall be given precedence and shall prevail over the amendments in this act to the extent that such acts are in conflict with this act.”

Definition of fireworks dictates authority. —

A county resolution attempting to ban the use, possession and sale of explosive devices not defined as fireworks in subsection (a) exceeded the board of commissioner's statutory authority and, therefore, was not in accordance with law. Board of County Comm'rs v. Dunnegan, 884 P.2d 35,

1994 Wyo. LEXIS 141

(Wyo. 1994).

§ 35-10-202.
Sale and use prohibited; exception.

Except as hereinafter provided, it is unlawful for any person to offer or expose for sale, sell, at either wholesale or retail, give away, use, discharge or detonate any fireworks in the state of Wyoming.

History.

Laws 1953, ch. 30, § 2; W.S. 1957, § 35-470; Laws 1983, ch. 119, § 1.

Cross references. —

For prohibition of fireworks in state parks and reserves, see §

36-8-104

.

Applied

in

Haddenham v. City of Laramie, 648 P.2d 551,

1982 Wyo. LEXIS 362

(Wyo. 1982).

Am. Jur. 2d, ALR and C.J.S. references. —

Liability of seller for sale of firearm, explosive, or highly inflammable substance to child, 20 ALR2d 119, 75 ALR3d 825, 95 ALR3d 390, 4 ALR4th 331.

Validity, construction, and application of state or local laws regulating the sale, possession, use, or transport of fireworks, 48 ALR5th 659.

§ 35-10-203.
Permits for public displays required.

Any governing body shall have the power to grant permits, within the area under its jurisdiction, for supervised public displays of fireworks by individuals, municipalities, amusement parks and other organizations and groups, and to adopt reasonable rules and regulations for the granting of such permits. Every such display shall be handled by a competent operator and shall be of such character and so located, discharged and fired as not to be hazardous to property or endanger any person.

No permit shall be transferable or assignable.

Repealed by Laws 2001, ch. 97, § 2.

History.

Laws 1953, ch. 30, § 3; W.S. 1957, § 35-471; Laws 2001, ch. 97, § 2.

Counties may not regulate fireworks. —

Sections

35-10-203

,

18-3-509

,

35-9-401

through

35-9-402

, and

35-9-301

through

35-9-304

provide no grants of authority, express or implied, allowing counties to regulate fireworks. Dunnegan v. Laramie County Comm'rs, 852 P.2d 1138,

1993 Wyo. LEXIS 95

(Wyo. 1993).

Am. Jur. 2d, ALR and C.J.S. references. —

Liability of private promoter or operator of public fireworks exhibition or display, 81 ALR2d 1207.

Validity, construction, and effect of agreement exempting operator of amusement facility from liability for personal injury or death of patron, 54 ALR5th 513.

§ 35-10-204.
Construction; exceptions.

This act [§§

35-10-201

through

35-10-208

] shall not be construed to prohibit:

Any person from offering for sale, exposing for sale, selling, or delivering fireworks to any municipality, association, amusement park, or other organization or group holding a permit issued as herein provided, or to the directors of the Wyoming state fair or of any county fair organized under the laws of this state;

Any person from using or exploding fireworks in accordance with the provisions of any permit issued as herein provided or as part of a supervised public display at the Wyoming state fair or of any county fair organized under the laws of this state;

Any person from offering for sale, exposing for sale, or selling, any fireworks which are to be and are shipped by commercial motor vehicle directly out of the state;

Any person from offering for sale, exposing for sale, selling, using, or exploding any article, device or substance for a purpose other than display, exhibition, amusement or entertainment; or when used for mining purposes, danger signals, or other necessary uses; or

Any person from offering for sale, exposing for sale, selling, using, or exploding blank cartridges for theatrical or ceremonial purposes or in organized athletic or sporting events.

History.

Laws 1953, ch. 30, § 4; W.S. 1957, § 35-472; Laws 1995, ch. 166, § 2.

Cross references. —

As to use of explosives in mining, see §§

30-2-501

to

30-2-607

.

Editor's notes. —

There is no subsection (b) in this section as it appears in the printed acts.

Am. Jur. 2d, ALR and C.J.S. references. —

Validity, construction, and application of state or local laws regulating the sale, possession, use, or transport of fireworks, 48 ALR5th 659.

§ 35-10-205.
Further regulations by municipalities.

This act [§§

35-10-201

through

35-10-208

] shall not be construed to prohibit the imposition by municipal ordinance of further regulations or prohibitions upon the sale, use and possession of fireworks within the corporate limits of any city or town, including those items defined under 15 U.S.C. § 1261, but no such city or town shall permit or authorize the sale, use or possession of any fireworks in violation of this act.

History.

Laws 1953, ch. 30, § 5; W.S. 1957, § 35-473; Laws 1993, ch. 141, § 1; 1995, ch. 166, § 2.

Cities may regulate fireworks within five miles of city limits. —

Nothing in the amended §

35-10-205

or the relatively newly enacted §

35-10-208

does damage to the fundamental proposition that the sales and use of fireworks may be regulated by cities within five miles of the city limits. Ford v. City of Riverton, 919 P.2d 636,

1996 Wyo. LEXIS 96

(Wyo. 1996).

Counties not authorized to enact stringent regulations of fireworks. —

This section does not grant counties the authority to enact more stringent regulations of the use, sale and possession of fireworks, then otherwise regulated by state law, and the decisions Haddenham v. Board of County Comm'rs, 679 P.2d 429,

1984 Wyo. LEXIS 276

(Wyo. 1984), overruled, Dunnegan v. Laramie County Comm'rs, 852 P.2d 1138,

1993 Wyo. LEXIS 95

(Wyo. 1993) and Gueke v. Board of County Comm'rs, 728 P.2d 167,

1986 Wyo. LEXIS 638

(Wyo. 1986), overruled, Dunnegan v. Laramie County Comm'rs, 852 P.2d 1138,

1993 Wyo. LEXIS 95

(Wyo. 1993).

A county resolution attempting to ban the use, possession and sale of explosive devices not defined as fireworks in § 35-10-201(a) exceeded the board of commissioner's statutory authority and, therefore, is not in accordance with law. Board of County Comm'rs v. Dunnegan, 884 P.2d 35,

1994 Wyo. LEXIS 141

(Wyo. 1994).

Law reviews. —

For article, “No Home On the Range For Home Rule,” see XXXI Land & Water L. Rev. 791 (1996).

Am. Jur. 2d, ALR and C.J.S. references. —

Municipality as liable for explosion of fireworks stored under permit, 17 ALR2d 683.

Validity, construction, and application of state or local laws regulating the sale, possession, use, or transport of fireworks, 48 ALR5th 659.

§ 35-10-206.
Enforcement; disposal of seized fireworks.

Wyoming peace officers shall seize all stocks of fireworks held in violation of W.S.

35-10-201

through

35-10-208

and shall apply to the appropriate court for the disposition of the fireworks. Following a hearing determining the fireworks were held in violation of W.S.

35-10-201

through

35-10-208

, the fireworks shall be destroyed or otherwise disposed of upon order of any circuit court or district court.

History.

Laws 1953, ch. 30, § 6; W.S. 1957, § 35-474; Laws 1983, ch. 119, § 1; 2000, ch. 24, § 4; 2004, ch. 42, § 1; ch. 130, § 1.

The 2004 amendments. —

The first 2004 amendment, by ch. 42, § 1, deleted “justice of the peace” following “disposed of upon order of any.”

Laws 2004, ch. 42, § 3, makes the act effective immediately upon completion of all acts necessary for a bill to become law as provided by art. 4, § 8, Wyo. Const. Approved March 3, 2004.

The second 2004 amendment, by ch. 130, § 1, twice substituted “35-10-208” for “35-10-207.”

See the conflicting legislation note. This section has been set out incorporating changes made by both 2004 acts.

Conflicting legislation. —

Laws 2004, ch. 130, § 3, provides: “Any other act adopted by the Wyoming legislature during the same session in which this act is adopted shall be given precedence and shall prevail over the amendments in this act to the extent that such acts are in conflict with this act.”

§ 35-10-207.
Penalties.

Any person violating any provision of W.S.

35-10-201

through

35-10-208

is guilty of a misdemeanor and upon conviction thereof shall be punished by a fine of not more than seven hundred fifty dollars ($750.00), or by imprisonment not exceeding sixty (60) days, or by both such fine and imprisonment.

History.

Laws 1953, ch. 30, § 7; W.S. 1957, § 35-475; Laws 1983, ch. 119, § 1; 2001, ch. 97, § 1.

§ 35-10-208.
County regulation of fireworks.

For the purpose of this section “fireworks” means only those items which may be sold or offered for sale under 15 U.S.C. § 1261, 21 U.S.C. § 371 and 16 C.F.R., Commercial Practices, part 1507. A board of county commissioners may, subject to subsection (b) of this section:

Prohibit the sale to Wyoming residents or use of fireworks by adopting a resolution under W.S.

35-9-301

;

Promulgate reasonable rules and regulations for authorizing the sale of fireworks.

Notwithstanding subsection (a) of this section, the proposition to prohibit, or authorize in counties that currently prohibit, the sale or use of fireworks in a county shall be submitted to the electors of the county upon receipt by the board of county commissioners of a petition requesting the election signed by a number of the electors of the county equal to fifteen percent (15%) of the total number of votes cast at the general election immediately preceding the date on which the petition is submitted, or by resolution of the board of county commissioners. The proposition shall be submitted at a primary or general election, if the petition or resolution is certified sixty (60) days prior to the primary or general election. If the proposition fails, no such petition shall be submitted for four (4) years following the election.

Any resolution adopted by a county prohibiting the sale or use of fireworks which was in effect on February 1, 1990, is deemed to be valid unless amended or repealed by the board of county commissioners pursuant to subsection (b) of this section.

History.

Laws 1995, ch. 166, § 1.

Cities may regulate fireworks within five miles of city limits. —

Nothing in the amended §

35-10-205

or the relatively newly enacted §

35-10-208

does damage to the fundamental proposition that the sales and use of fireworks may be regulated by cities within five miles of the city limits. Ford v. City of Riverton, 919 P.2d 636,

1996 Wyo. LEXIS 96

(Wyo. 1996).

Am. Jur. 2d, ALR and C.J.S. references. —

Validity, construction, and application of state or local laws regulating the sale, possession, use, or transport of fireworks, 48 ALR5th 659.